New Jersey, session 221, A5282.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2013, c.257 (C.18A:35-4.27) is amended to read as follows: 1. a. Beginning with the [2014-2015 school year] first full school year following the effective date of P.L.    , c. (pending before the Legislature as this bill), each school district shall incorporate instruction on the responsible use of, and risks associated with, social media [into the technology education curriculum] and cell phones for students in grades 6 through [8] 12 as part of the district's implementation of the [Core Curriculum Content Standards in Technology] New Jersey Student Learning Standards in Comprehensive Health and Physical Education. b.    The instruction shall provide students with information on: (1)   the purpose and [acceptable] responsible use of various social media platforms and cell phones; (2)   social media behavior that ensures cyber safety, cyber security, and cyber ethics; [and] (3)   the potential negative consequences[, including cyber bullying,] of failing to use various social media platforms responsibly, including cyber bullying and cell phone addiction; and (4)   the potential negative impact of social media and cell phone addiction on an individuals mental health, personal relationships, and personal development. c.     The Commissioner of Education shall provide school districts with sample learning activities and resources designed to promote the responsible use of social media and cell phones. (cf: P.L.2013, c.257, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.